Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-219
School lands; acquisition by county for public purposes.

The county board of any county, in which there are such educational lands, may acquire for public purposes any portion thereof, not exceeding forty acres.

Laws 1915, c. 103, § 1, p. 247;

Laws 1921, c. 80, § 2, p. 290;

C.S.1922, § 5191;

Laws 1923, c. 61, § 1, p. 185;

Laws 1925, c. 135, § 1, p. 254;

Laws 1929, c. 188, § 1, p. 652;

C.S.1929, § 72-211;

Laws 1931, c. 118, § 1, p. 345;

Laws 1935, c. 164, § 1, p. 611;

Laws 1941, c. 145, § 1, p. 576;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-211;

Laws 1943, c. 160, § 1, p. 574;

R.S.1943, § 72-219.

County may acquire educational land for county fair grounds. State v. Cheyenne County, 157 Neb. 533, 60 N.W.2d 593 (1953).